Wyoming statutes. Title 14 Children
Article 4. Child Protection Act
§ 14-3-427.
Predisposition studies and reports.

After a petition is filed alleging a child is neglected, the court shall order the department of family services to make a predisposition study and report. The court shall establish a deadline for completion of the report. While preparing the study the department shall consult with the child’s school and school district to determine the child’s educational needs. The study and report shall also cover:

The social history, environment and present condition of the child and his family;

The performance of the child in school, including whether the child receives special education services and how his goals and objectives might be impacted by the court’s disposition, provided the school receives authorization to share the information;

The presence of child abuse and neglect or domestic violence histories, past acts of violence, learning disabilities, cognitive disabilities or physical impairments and the necessary services to accommodate the disabilities and impairments;

The presence of any mental health or substance abuse risk factors, including current participation in counseling, therapy or treatment; and

Other matters relevant to treatment of the child, including any pertinent family information, or proper disposition of the case, including any information required by W.S. 21-13-315(d).

Within ten (10) days after a petition is filed alleging a child is neglected, the court shall appoint a multidisciplinary team. Upon motion by a party, the court may add or dismiss a member of the multidisciplinary team.

The multidisciplinary team shall include the following:

The child’s parent, parents or guardian;

A representative of the school district who has direct knowledge of the child and, if the child receives special education, is a member of the child’s individualized education plan team;

A representative of the department of family services;

The child’s psychiatrist, psychologist or mental health professional;

The district attorney or his designee;

The child’s attorney or guardian ad litem, if one is appointed by the court;

The volunteer lay advocate, if one is appointed by the court; and

The foster parent.

In addition to the persons listed in subsection (c) of this section, the court may appoint one (1) or more of the following persons to the multidisciplinary team:

and (ii) Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 236, § 4.

The child;

A relative;

If the predispositional study indicates a parent or child has special needs, an appropriate representative of the department of health’s substance abuse, mental health or developmental disabilities division who has knowledge of the services available in the state’s system of care that are pertinent to those identified needs;

Other professionals or persons who have particular knowledge relating to the child or his family, or expertise in children’s services and the child’s or parent’s specific disability or special needs, including linguistic and cultural needs.

Before the first multidisciplinary team meeting, the department of family services shall provide each member of the multidisciplinary team with a brief summary of the case detailing the allegations in the petition that have been adjudicated, if any. The multidisciplinary team shall review the child’s personal and family history, school records, mental health records and department of family services records and any other pertinent information, for the purpose of making case planning recommendations. To the extent appropriate, the team shall involve the child in the development of the recommendations.

At the first multidisciplinary team meeting, the team shall formulate reasonable and attainable recommendations for the court outlining the goals or objectives the parents should be required to meet for the child to be returned to the home or for the case to be closed, or until ordered by the court in termination proceedings. At each subsequent meeting, the multidisciplinary team shall review the progress of the parents and the child, and shall reevaluate the plan ordered by the court. For cause, which shall be set forth with specificity, the multidisciplinary team may adjust its recommendations to the court with respect to the goals or objectives in the plan to effect the return of the child to the home or to close the case. In formulating recommendations, the multidisciplinary team shall give consideration to the best interest of the child, the best interest of the family, the most appropriate and least restrictive case planning options available as well as costs of care. After each multidisciplinary team meeting, the coordinator shall prepare for submission to each member of the team and to the court a summary of the multidisciplinary team meeting specifically describing the recommendations for the court and the goals and objectives which should be met to return the child to the home or to close the case. If the recommendations for the case plan have been changed, the summary shall include a detailed explanation of the change in the recommendations and the reasons for the change.

All records, reports and case planning recommendations of the multidisciplinary team are confidential except as provided by this section. Any person who willfully violates this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500.00).

The court shall not consider any report or recommendation under this section prior to adjudication of the allegations in the petition without the consent of the child and the child’s parents, guardian or custodian.

Any member of a multidisciplinary team who cannot attend team meetings in person or by telephone may submit written reports and recommendations to the other team members and to the court. Individuals who are not members of the multidisciplinary team but have knowledge pertinent to the team’s decisions may be asked to provide information to the multidisciplinary team. The individuals shall be bound by the confidentiality provisions of subsection (g) of this section.

The department shall develop a case plan for a child when there is a recommendation to place the child outside the home. If a parent chooses not to comply with or participate in the case plan developed by the department, that parent is prohibited from later objecting to or complaining about the services that were provided to the child and family.

If the child is placed outside the home, the multidisciplinary team shall meet quarterly to review the child’s and the family’s progress toward meeting the goals or expectations in the case plan and the multidisciplinary team shall provide a written report with recommendations to the court prior to each review hearing.

No later than five (5) business days prior to the dispositional hearing, the multidisciplinary team shall file with the court the multidisciplinary team report which shall include the multidisciplinary team’s recommendations and the department case plan in a standard format established by the department.

Five (5) business days prior to each review hearing, the multidisciplinary team shall file with the court a report updating the multidisciplinary team report, the multidisciplinary team’s recommendations and the department case plan.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1; 2005, ch. 236, §§ 2, 4; 2009, ch. 70, § 1, ch 196, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote the section, in part modifying duties, changing membership of multidisciplinary teams, and adding procedural provisions.

The 2009 amendments. —

The first 2009 amendment, by Laws 2009, ch. 70, § 1, effective July 1, 2009, added the first sentence in (e); and, in (f), added the first three sentences and the last two sentences.

The second 2009 amendment, by Laws 2009, ch. 196, § 1, effective July 1, 2009, added the last sentence in (k).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Laws 2009, ch. 70, § 2, provides: “The provisions of W.S. 14-3-427(e) and (f), 14-3-429(d), 14-6-227(e) and (f) and 14-6-427(e) and (f) as amended by section 1 of this act, shall apply to child protection cases in which a petition was filed under W.S.

14-3-412

,

14-6-212

or

14-6-412

on or after July 1, 2009.”

Improper preservation of issue for review. —

Court declined to address the merits of whether the State, trial court, or family services department failed to comply with this section, other sections, and various department rules in connection with the alleged lack of formal written reports and written case plan or the delay in setting an adjudicatory hearing because the mother failed to support her grievances with citations to relevant precedent and failed to show how any alleged deficiencies in the trial court prejudiced her; but the court did not retreat from its conviction that the judicial system had to be diligent in protecting parental rights, nor did the court imply that the department or any administrative agency was free to ignore statutes, agency rules, or court orders.DH v. Wyo. Dep't of Family Servs. (In re "H" Children), 2003 WY 155, 79 P.3d 997,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 2003), reh'g denied,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. Jan. 13, 2004).

Cited in

DB v. State (In re CRA), 2016 WY 24, 368 P.3d 294,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 2016).

§ 14-3-428.
Abeyance of proceedings by consent decree; term of decree; reinstatement of proceedings; effect of discharge or completing term.

At any time after the filing of a petition alleging a child to be neglected and before adjudication, the court may issue a consent decree ordering further proceedings held in abeyance. The placement of the child is subject to the terms, conditions and stipulations agreed to by the parties affected in accordance with W.S.

14-3-429

. The consent decree shall not be entered without the consent of the district attorney, the child’s guardian ad litem and the parents. Modifications to an existing consent decree may be allowed.

The consent decree shall be in writing and copies given to all parties. The decree shall include the case plan for the family.

A consent decree, if the child remains within the home, shall be in force for the period agreed upon by the parties unless sooner terminated by the court.

If the child is placed outside the home, a consent decree shall be in force for the period agreed upon by the parties but not longer than six (6) months unless sooner terminated by the court. For good cause the court may grant one (1) extension of the consent decree for no longer than six (6) months.

If a consent decree is in effect and the child is in placement, the court shall hold review hearings as provided by W.S.

14-3-431

.

If prior to discharge by the court or expiration of the consent decree, the parents or guardian of a child alleged to be neglected fail to fulfill the terms and conditions of the decree or a new petition is filed alleging the child to be neglected, the original petition and proceeding may be reinstated upon order of the court after hearing, and the court may proceed as though the consent decree had never been entered. If, as part of the consent decree, the parents or guardian made an admission to any of the allegations contained in the original petition, that admission shall be entered only if the court orders that the original petition and proceeding be reinstated and the admissions, if any, be entered. If the admission is entered, the court may proceed to disposition pursuant to W.S.

14-3-426

.

Parties discharged by the court under a consent decree without reinstatement of the original petition and proceeding shall not thereafter be proceeded against in any court for the same misconduct alleged in the original petition except concurrent criminal allegations or charges against a person accused to have abused or neglected a child shall not be affected by a consent decree.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1; 2004, ch. 127, § 2.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (a), inserted “the child's guardian ad litem” following “the consent of the district attorney,” and “added the last sentence; added (b); redesignated the former first sentence of (b) as (c), and inserted “if the child remains within the home” and deleted “but not longer than one (1) year”; added (d) and (e); redesignated the former second sentence of (b) as (f), and added the second sentence; redesignated former (c) as (g), and substituted “Parties discharged by the court” for “If the parties to the consent decree complete the period of supervision”; and made related and stylistic changes.

Extension. —

District court
erred in denying a mother's motion to dismiss a consent degree because,
while the mother's children were returned to her after the appeal
was filed and the underlying juvenile case had been closed, the motion
was not moot where it was necessary to provide guidance to state agencies
and lower courts, the court lacked authority to extend the consent
decree after it had expired, and the State's failure to initiate action
within the six-month period specified in the decree deprived the juvenile
court of any opportunity to modify or extend the decree “for
good cause.” CY v. State (In the Interest of DJS-Y), 2017 WY 54, 394 P.3d 467,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 54

(Wyo. 2017).

Revocation of consent decree. —

Court erred
by revoking a consent decree in the neglect case because, although
the court did not lose jurisdiction when the court was empowered
to
conduct a hearing and rule on the accusations, the court erred
in
concluding that the Mother violated the terms of the consent decree
by drinking alcohol when the consent decree agreement did not expressly
prohibit Mother from drinking but only required her to undergo alcohol/substance
abuse evaluation and follow the regimen of treatment recommended.
MR v. State (In the Interest of CDR), 2015 WY 79, 351 P.3d 264,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 91

(Wyo. 2015).

Generally. —

Nothing in the plain language of
Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

14-3-428

requires the court to conduct a hearing or make findings before a consent decree can end either by expiration of its term, or by discharge by the court.
DB v. State (In re CRA), 2016 WY 24, 368 P.3d 294,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 2016).

Supreme Court of Wyoming declines to interpret Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

14-3-428

as requiring a hearing prior to the juvenile court's discharge of a parent because the plain language of the statute does not include such a requirement. Similarly, the statute does not require any court findings prior to discharge. DB v. State (In re CRA), 2016 WY 24, 368 P.3d 294,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 2016).

Dismissal proper. —

Juvenile court properly dismissed a neglect action against a mother without a hearing or findings about the mother's completion of a consent decree's requirements where nothing in the plain language of
Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

14-3-428

required a hearing or findings before a consent decree could expire by its own expiration terms or by discharge, and there was nothing for the juvenile court to find or decide given that the county attorney had decided that the mother had complied with the consent decree satisfactorily and decided not to pursue the neglect case.
DB v. State (In re CRA), 2016 WY 24, 368 P.3d 294,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 2016).

§ 14-3-429.
Decree where child adjudged neglected; dispositions; terms and conditions; legal custody.

In determining the disposition to be made under this act in regard to any child:

The court shall review the predisposition report, the recommendations, if any, of the multidisciplinary team, the case plan and other reports or evaluations ordered by the court and indicate on the record what materials were considered in reaching the disposition;

If the court does not place the child in accordance with the recommendations of the predisposition report or multidisciplinary team, the court shall enter on the record specific findings of fact relied upon to support its decision to deviate from the recommended disposition;

When a child is adjudged by the court to be neglected the court shall enter its decree to that effect and make a disposition as provided in this section that places the child in the least restrictive environment consistent with what is best suited to the public interest of preserving families and the physical, mental and moral welfare of the child;

When a child is adjudged to be neglected the court shall ensure that reasonable efforts were made by the department of family services to prevent or eliminate the need for removal of the child from the child’s home or to make it possible for the child to return to the child’s home. Before placing a child outside of the home, the court shall find by clear and convincing evidence that to return the child to the child’s home would not be in the best interest of the child despite efforts that have been made;

The court shall not order an out-of-state placement unless:

Evidence has been presented to the court regarding the costs of the out-of-state placement being ordered together with evidence of the comparative costs of any suitable alternative in-state treatment program or facility, as determined by the department of family services pursuant to W.S. 21-13-315(d)(vii), whether or not placement in the in-state program or facility is currently available;

The court makes an affirmative finding on the record that no placement can be made in a Wyoming institution or in a private residential treatment facility or group home located in Wyoming that can provide adequate treatment or services for the child; and

The court states on the record why no in-state placement is available.

If the child is found to be neglected the court may:

Permit the child to remain in the legal custody of his parents, guardian or custodian without protective supervision, subject to terms and conditions prescribed by the court;

Place the child under protective supervision;

Transfer temporary legal custody to a relative or other suitable adult the court finds qualified to receive and care for the child, with or without supervision, subject to terms and conditions prescribed by the court;

Transfer temporary legal custody to the department of family services or a state or local public agency responsible for the care and placement of neglected children, provided the child shall not be committed to the Wyoming boys’ school, the Wyoming girls’ school or the Wyoming state hospital.

In cases where a child is ordered removed from the child’s home:

If a child is committed or transferred to an agency or institution under this section, at least every three (3) months the agency or institution shall recommend to the court if the order should be continued;

The court shall order the parents or other legally obligated person to pay a reasonable sum for the support and treatment of the child as required by W.S.

14-3-435

, or shall state on the record the reasons why an order for support was not entered;

In cases where the child is placed in custody of the department, support shall be established by the department through a separate civil action;

Any order regarding potential placement at a psychiatric residential treatment facility shall not specify a particular psychiatric residential treatment facility or level of care for the placement of the child;

If the child is placed in a qualified residential treatment program:

Within thirty (30) days of the placement a qualified individual shall conduct an assessment to determine whether the child’s needs can be met through placement with family members or in a foster family home, or if the placement in a qualified residential treatment program provides the most effective and appropriate level of care for the child in the least restrictive environment consistent with short-term and long-term goals of the child and the child’s permanency plan;

Within sixty (60) days of the placement the court shall:

Consider the assessment completed pursuant to subparagraph (A) of this paragraph;

Determine whether the child’s needs can be met through placement in a foster family home or whether the placement in a qualified residential treatment program provides the most effective and appropriate level of care for the child in the least restrictive environment;

Determine whether the placement is consistent with short-term and long-term goals of the child, as specified in the child’s permanency plan;

Approve or disapprove the placement.

As a part of any order of disposition and the terms and conditions thereof, the court may:

Impose any demands, requirements, limitations, restrictions or restraints on the child, and do all things with regard to the child that his parents might reasonably and lawfully do under similar circumstances;

Order the child, or his parents, or both, to undergo evaluation and indicated treatment or another program designed to address problems which contributed to the adjudication. A parent who willfully violates or neglects or refuses to comply with any order of the court may be found in contempt and punished as provided by W.S.

14-3-438

;

Require the child’s parents or guardian to attend a parenting class or other appropriate education or treatment designed to address problems which contributed to the adjudication and to pay all or part of the cost of the class, education or treatment in accordance with the court’s determination of their ability to pay;

Require the child’s parents or guardian and the child to participate in a court supervised treatment program qualified under W.S.

7-13-1601

through

7-13-1615

, provided the court supervised treatment program accepts the child’s parents or guardian and the child for participation in its program.

An institution, organization or agency vested with legal custody of a child by court order shall have the right to determine where and with whom the child shall live, provided that placement of the child does not remove him from the state of Wyoming without court authorization. An individual vested with legal custody of a child by court order shall personally exercise custodial rights and responsibilities unless otherwise authorized by the court.

Whenever the court vests legal custody of a child in an institution, organization or agency it shall transmit with the order copies of all clinical reports, social studies and other information pertinent to the care and treatment of the child. The institution, organization or agency receiving legal custody of a child shall provide the court with any information concerning the child that the court may request.

In placing a child in the custody of an individual or a private agency or institution, the court shall give primary consideration to the needs and welfare of the child. Where a choice of equivalent services exists, the court shall, whenever practicable, select a person or an agency or institution governed by persons of the same religion as that of the parents of the child. In case of a difference in the religious faith of the parents, then the court shall select the person, agency or institution governed by persons of the religious faith of the child, or if the religious faith of the child is not ascertainable, then of the faith of either parent.

Absent a specific provision in the placement order requiring prior court approval for any change in placement, a department of state government vested with temporary legal custody of a child by court order under this section has authority to place the child in a residential facility or other out-of-home placement of similar or less restrictive confinement provided:

At least ten (10) days prior to the change in placement written notice of the proposed placement is served upon the child, the child’s parents, the child’s representative, the current placement provider and the office of the district attorney of original jurisdiction, personally or by certified mail to the recipient’s last known address; and

None of the parties within ten (10) days after notice is filed with the juvenile court having jurisdiction, makes a written objection to the proposed change in placement.

If a placement order vesting a department of state government with temporary legal custody of a child under this section includes a provision that court approval shall be required prior to any change in placement, the department may proceed to place the child in a residential facility or other out-of-home placement of similar or less restrictive confinement, and the court shall be deemed to have approved such change in placement, if:

The conditions of paragraphs (h)(i) and (ii) of this section are met; and

The court on its own motion does not set the matter for hearing within fifteen (15) days after notice of the proposed change in placement is filed with the juvenile court.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1; 2004, ch. 127, § 2; 2009, ch. 70, § 1; ch. 145, § 2; 2013 ch. 164, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2020 ch. 2, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (a)(i), substituted “review” for “place on the record,” and inserted “the case plan and other reports or evaluations ordered by the court and indicate on the record what materials were considered in reaching the disposition” at the end, and in (a)(ii) deleted “and in accord with the actual facilities presently available when the decree is entered” at the end; in (b)(i) inserted “legal” preceding “custody of his parents,” and in (b)(iv) inserted “the department of family services or” following “Transfer temporary legal custody to”; in (c)(ii), deleted “on its own motion, or on the motion of the person, agency or institution vested with custody or to whom compensation is due” preceding “shall order the parents or other legally,”; and added (c)(iii); and made stylistic changes throughout.

The 2009 amendments. —

The first 2009 amendment, by ch. 70, § 1, effective July 1, 2009, inserted “designed to address problems which contributed to the adjudication” in (d)(iii).

The second 2009 amendment by ch. 145, § 2, effective July 1, 2009, added (d)(iv).

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added (c)(iv).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, added (c)(v).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Laws 2009, ch. 70, § 2, effective July 1, 2009, provides: “The provisions of W.S. 14-3-427(e) and (f), 14-3-429(d), 14-6-227(e) and (f) and 14-6-427(e) and (f) as amended by section 1 of this act, shall apply to child protection cases in which a petition was filed under W.S.

14-3-412

,

14-6-212

or

14-6-412

on or after July 1, 2009.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-3-402(a)(xxiv).

Appropriations. —

Laws 2005, ch. 245, § 3, appropriates $1,000,000 from the general fund to the department of health beginning July 1, 2005, to provide funding for the implementation of best practices prevention and intervention services including parenting skills, life skills and indicated therapeutic interventions for the children and families of those individuals receiving treatment or addiction to methamphetamine and other controlled substances.

Laws 2005, ch. 245, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2005.

Sufficiency of evidence. —

Clear and convincing evidence regarding safety concerns and other matters showed that the agency made reasonable efforts to prevent the initial removal and that the children's best interests would not be served by allowing them to remain in their mother's home.
RH v. State (In the Interest of DRS), 2011 WY 128, 261 P.3d 697,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. 2011).

There was sufficient evidence to support the juvenile court's change in the permanency plan from reunification to adoption, including evidence that the mother failed to obtain housing, to obtain employment, to follow the recommendations of the Addiction Severity Index evaluation to participate in an intensive outpatient treatment, and failed to continue court-ordered urine analysis tests. DT v. State, 2017 WY 36, 391 P.3d 1136,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 2017).

Applicability. —

Because children already had been adjudicated neglected before they were removed from their mother's custody and placed with relatives, the juvenile court correctly applied this section instead of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

14-3-405

in deciding its conclusions of law.
RH v. State (In the Interest of DRS), 2011 WY 128, 261 P.3d 697,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. 2011).

Quoted

in

Jet v. State (In re Drt), 2010 WY 137, 241 P.3d 489,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 146

(Oct. 21, 2010); Jo v. State, Dep't of Family Servs. (in the Interest of Re), 2011 WY 170, 267 P.3d 1092,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 174

(Dec. 28, 2011).

Cited

in

DH v. Wyo. Dep't of Family Servs. (In re “H” Children), 2003 WY 155, 79 P.3d 997,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 2003); HP v. State, 2004 WY 82, 93 P.3d 982,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 108

(2004); LW v. State (In the Interest of JW), 2010 WY 28, 226 P.3d 873,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Mar. 18, 2010).

§ 14-3-430.
Orders of protection; requirements.

On application of any party to the proceedings or on its own motion the court may make an order of protection in support of the decree and order of disposition, restraining or otherwise controlling the conduct of the child’s parents, guardian or custodian or any party to the proceeding whom the court finds to be encouraging, causing or contributing to the acts or conditions which bring the child within the provisions of this act.

The order of protection may require the person against whom it is directed to do or to refrain from doing any acts required or forbidden by law and necessary for the welfare of the child and the enforcement of the order of disposition, including the following requirements to:

Perform any legal obligation of support;

Not make contact with the child or his place of abode;

Permit a parent reasonable visitation privileges under specified conditions and terms; or

Give proper attention to care of the home and to refrain from conduct detrimental to the child and the home environment.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-3-402(a)(xxiv).